Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-126.04
County court; adoption; fees.

In all matters of adoption, for each child adopted five dollars shall be allowed the court for the entire proceeding.

R.S.1866, c. 19, § 8, p. 164;

Laws 1887, c. 41, § 1, p. 460;

Laws 1907, c. 56, § 1, p. 231;

Laws 1909, c. 58, § 1, p. 288;

R.S.1913, § 2449;

Laws 1915, c. 39, § 1, p. 111;

Laws 1917, c. 45, § 1, p. 127;

Laws 1921, c. 95, § 1, p. 359;

C.S.1922, § 2388;

Laws 1925, c. 98, § 1, p. 286;

C.S.1929, § 33-127;

Laws 1931, c. 64, § 1, p. 173;

Laws 1937, c. 86, § 1, p. 286;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 33-127;

R.S.1943, § 33-126;

Laws 1945, c. 74, § 4, p. 278;

Laws 1949, c. 95, § 1(4), p. 256;

Laws 1961, c. 163, § 1, p. 493;

Laws 1975, LB 481, § 25;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 35;

Laws 1984, LB 492, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 233, § 7.